Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Implementation of Central Purchasing by Counties

§ 31-7-101.
Implementation of central purchase system; establishment of department of purchasing; appointment of purchase clerk and receiving clerk.

From and after the first Monday of January 1989, the supervisors of each county in the state shall establish a central purchase system. The central purchase system shall be administered by a county department of purchasing headed by a purchase clerk who, unless the chancery clerk is appointed by the board of supervisors as purchase clerk as hereinafter authorized, shall be appointed by the county administrator, with the approval of the board of supervisors, in any county required to operate under a countywide system of road administration, or who shall be appointed by the board of supervisors in any other county. The purchase clerk shall not be a member of the board of supervisors. The purchase clerk shall be the director of the department of purchasing. No person shall serve as the purchase clerk who, within one (1) year after his appointment, does not receive certification from the State Auditor as having successfully completed the professional education program offered for purchase clerks pursuant to Section 19-3-77.

The department of purchasing shall purchase all equipment, heavy equipment, machinery, supplies, commodities, materials and services used by any office or department of the county except for those offices or departments whose expenditures are not required by law to be approved by the board of supervisors. The purchase clerk may, subject to the approval of the entity which appointed him, hire personnel necessary to operate the department of purchasing efficiently. Unless the chancery clerk is appointed by the board of supervisors as receiving clerk as hereinafter authorized, the county administrator, with the approval of the board of supervisors, in any county required to operate under the countywide system of road administration, or the board of supervisors in any other county, shall appoint a receiving clerk, who shall not be a member of the board of supervisors. Assistant receiving clerks, when necessary, may be appointed by the receiving clerk subject to the approval of the entity which appointed him. No person shall serve as the receiving clerk who, within one (1) year after his appointment, does not receive certification from the State Auditor as having successfully completed the professional education program offered for receiving clerks pursuant to Section 19-3-77. The receiving clerk and his assistants shall be solely responsible for accepting the delivery of all equipment, heavy equipment, machinery, supplies, commodities, materials and services purchased by the county.

The purchase clerk shall disapprove any purchase requisitions which, in his opinion, are not in compliance with the purchasing laws of the state.

The board of supervisors may designate the chancery clerk, with his consent, to serve as the purchase clerk or assistant purchase clerk or as the receiving clerk or assistant receiving clerk; however a chancery clerk designated as purchase clerk or assistant purchase clerk may not also serve as receiving clerk or assistant receiving clerk, and a chancery clerk designated as receiving clerk or assistant receiving clerk may not serve as purchase clerk or assistant purchase clerk. Neither the purchase clerk nor any assistant purchase clerks shall serve as the receiving clerk or as an assistant receiving clerk.

When the chancery clerk serves as county administrator and purchase clerk or assistant purchase clerk, the receiving clerk and any assistant receiving clerks shall be appointed by and serve at the will and pleasure of the board of supervisors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 513, § 1; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 21, eff from and after January 2, 1989.

§ 31-7-103.
General responsibility of purchase clerk; central purchase system to comply with requirements of State Department of Audit; purchases of $1,000.00 or less.

The purchase clerk shall be responsible as hereinafter provided for the purchase and acquisition of all equipment, heavy equipment, machinery, supplies, commodities, materials and services to be acquired for the county from successful bidders or other vendors, as authorized by law. The central purchase system shall comply with the requirements prescribed by the State Department of Audit under the authority of Section 7-7-211 and in accordance with Section 31-7-113, and the purchase clerk shall be responsible for the maintenance of such system. No requisition to purchase, purchase order or receiving report shall be required for the purchase of any item or services with an acquisition cost of not more than One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) in the aggregate; however, the invoice for every such purchase shall be signed by the department head or his or her designee, or a receipt signed by the person making the purchase shall be attached to the invoice and forwarded to the purchase clerk.No claim based on any such purchase shall be approved except after compliance with the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 513, § 2; Laws, 1975, ch. 359; Laws, 1984, ch. 312; Laws, 1985, ch. 514, § 12; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 22; Laws, 1994, ch. 476, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 340, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 420, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 429, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 31-7-105.
Procedure on bids.

Upon acceptance of any bid by the board of supervisors, as provided in Section 31-7-13, the clerk of the board of supervisors, shall forthwith deliver to the purchase clerk a certified copy of such accepted bid. The accepted bid or offer to furnish equipment, heavy equipment, machinery, supplies, commodities, materials or services shall constitute the sole source for such purchase, unless such purchase is otherwise authorized by law. The term “lowest and best bid” shall not include any person, firm, partnership or corporation other than the person, firm, partnership or corporation actually submitting the bid determined to be the lowest and best bid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 513, § 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 16; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 23, eff from and after January 2, 1989.

§ 31-7-107.
Inventory control.

In addition to the required central purchase system, from and after the first Monday in January 1989, each county shall establish and maintain an inventory control system pursuant to requirements prescribed by the State Department of Audit under the authority of Section 7-7-211 and in accordance with Section 31-7-113; provided, however, that not more than a sixty (60) day inventory of supplies, commodities and materials shall be kept on hand unless otherwise approved by the board of supervisors. The inventory control clerk shall be employed or designated in the same manner and by the same entity which employs or designates the purchase clerk. The inventory control clerk shall be responsible for the maintenance of such system and such other personnel as may be required for the efficient operation of the inventory control system and shall not be a member of the board of supervisors. No person shall serve as the inventory control clerk who, within one (1) year after his appointment, does not receive certification from the State Auditor as having successfully completed the professional education program offered for inventory control clerks pursuant to Section 19-3-77. The opening entries of such system shall be compiled by the inventory control clerk from a physical inventory which the board of supervisors shall cause to be made of all property of the county by April 1, 1989, and such beginning inventory shall be recorded in the minutes of the board of supervisors. The clerk of the board of supervisors shall deliver to the inventory control clerk a certified copy of such inventory within seven (7) days after the acceptance of the beginning inventory by the board of supervisors. Following acceptance of the beginning inventory, the inventory control clerk, pursuant to regulations promulgated by the State Auditor, shall perform physical inventories of assets of the county on or before October 1 of each year and shall file with the board of supervisors, in triplicate, a written report of such inventory. The clerk of the board of supervisors shall keep the original of each inventory report so filed by the inventory control clerk as a permanent record of the county and shall forward a copy to the State Department of Audit not later than October 15. In a separate report to the clerk of the board, the inventory control clerk shall list additions to and deletions from the annual inventory report and shall also list items unaccounted for from the previous annual inventory report.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 513, § 4; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 24, eff from and after January 2, 1989.

§ 31-7-109.
Receiving reports.

The receiving clerk or his assistants shall, upon proper delivery of equipment, heavy equipment, machinery, supplies, commodities, materials or services, acknowledge receipt of goods in compliance with a receipting system prescribed by the State Department of Audit under the authority of Section 7-7-211 and in accordance with Section 31-7-113, and the receiving clerk shall be responsible for the maintenance of such system.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 513, § 5; Laws, 1975, ch. 360; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 25, eff from and after January 2, 1989.

§ 31-7-111.
Custody of records.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 25-61-11.2, such records, reports, supporting documents or data compiled, maintained, protected or otherwise in the custody of either the purchase clerk or the inventory control clerk shall be made freely available to the other immediately upon request. Such records, reports, supporting documents or data shall be public records and shall be made available for inspection during reasonable hours to any person requesting the same.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 513, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1974); Laws, 2019, ch. 443, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 31-7-113.
State department of audit to design and prescribe forms and systems.

The State Department of Audit, under the authority of Section 7-7-211, shall design and prescribe the form of the inventory to be made, the form of the purchase requisition, the form of the purchase order, the form of the receiving report; prescribe systems of filing and prescribe the system of records necessary for the maintenance of a central purchase system, receiving system and an inventory control system; and shall promulgate and prescribe such other documentation, procedures and regulations necessary for the efficient maintenance of such systems.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 513, § 7; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 26, eff from and after January 2, 1989.

§ 31-7-115.
Audit reports.

The State Auditor, or a certified public accountant employed by the State Auditor, shall, upon the close of the fiscal year of the county, make an audit of the books, records, supporting documents and other data of the county purchase clerk and the inventory control clerk. The Auditor shall review the county’s compliance with Section 31-7-13(d), (k) and (m). The audit report shall include a schedule of purchases not made from the lowest bidder under the authority of Section 31-7-13(d), with the reasons given therefor. The audit report shall include a schedule of emergency purchases made under the authority of Section 31-7-13(k). The audit report shall include a schedule of purchases made noncompetitively from a sole source under the authority of Section 31-7-13(m). Such audit report shall be published in at least one (1) newspaper published in the county, or if no newspaper is published in the county, then in a newspaper having general circulation in the county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 513, § 8; Laws, 1986, ch. 489, § 15; Laws, 1994, ch. 594, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 31-7-117.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 61, eff from and after January 2, 1989.

§31-7-117. [En Laws, 1974, ch. 513, § 9]

§ 31-7-118.
County employees permitted to also serve as purchase clerk, receiving clerk or inventory clerk.

Nothing in Sections 31-7-101 through 31-7-127 shall be construed to prohibit the board of supervisors from designating any county employees, in addition to other responsibilities, to also serve as purchase clerk, receiving clerk or inventory control clerk; however, except as otherwise authorized in Section 19-4-1 and subsection (2) of this section, any employee designated to serve as one of the foregoing shall not at the same time be designated to serve as any of the other.

In any county having a population of less than three thousand (3,000) according to the latest federal decennial census, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, designate the same person to serve as purchase clerk, receiving clerk and inventory control clerk, or any combination of such positions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 27, eff from and after January 2, 1989.

§ 31-7-119.
Board of supervisors not to purchase, order or receive products for county; exceptions.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, neither the board of supervisors nor any member thereof shall individually purchase, order or receive any equipment, heavy equipment, machinery, supplies, commodities, materials or services for the use or benefit of the county.

In any county in which the board of supervisors is not required to operate on a countywide system of road administration, the prohibition as provided in subsection (1) of this section shall not apply (a) to purchases of not more than One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) in the aggregate; or (b) to the purchase of parts or repair services in emergency situations, which purchases are exempt from bid requirements pursuant to Section 31-7-13(m) (ii) and (iii), Mississippi Code of 1972. Any supervisor who purchases any item or services in accordance with this subsection (2) shall sign the invoice or receipt and forward it to the purchase clerk in the manner provided by Section 31-7-103. No claim based on any such purchase shall be approved unless the purchase was made in compliance with the provisions of this subsection.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 513, § 10; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 28; Laws, 1994, ch. 476, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 340, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 420, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 429, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§§ 31-7-121 and 31-7-123.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1988, Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 61, eff from and after January 2, 1989.

§31-7-121. [En Laws, 1974, ch. 513, § 11]

§31-7-123. [En Laws, 1974, ch. 513, § 12; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 35]

§ 31-7-124.
Bond of purchase clerk, receiving clerk and inventory control clerk.

The purchase clerk, receiving clerk and inventory control clerk shall give bond in a penalty equal to Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00) with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law. All assistant purchasing, receiving and inventory control clerks shall be bonded in a penalty not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00). Such bond shall be in addition to any other bond required by law, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law. The premiums of such bonds shall be paid from any funds available to the board of supervisors for the payment of such premiums.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 29; Laws, 2009, ch. 467, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 31-7-125.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 61, eff from and after January 2, 1989.

§31-7-125. [En Laws, 1974, ch. 513, § 13; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 36]

§ 31-7-127.
Enforcement.

In order to ensure the proper enforcement of Sections 31-7-101 through 31-7-127, as well as to ensure the enforcement of all other laws pertaining to county government or the board of supervisors, the district attorney, in addition to any other powers he already has, shall have the power to investigate the personnel, records or supervisors of any county in his district and shall have the power to bring criminal or civil actions to recover funds illegally spent, to recover damages, or to seek injunctive relief to prevent unlawful acts or compel lawful ones by supervisors or other personnel of county government. In the event of a refusal or failure of the district attorney to act, the Attorney General in a proper case may exercise the above powers of the district attorney, notwithstanding the absence of a request for investigation or action by the district attorney.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 513, § 14; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 30, eff from and after January 2, 1989.

§ 31-7-129.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 469, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§31-7-129. [En Laws, 1974, ch. 513, § 15]